Utah statutes.
34A-3-101.   Title -- Definitions.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Utah Occupational Disease Act."

(2)  For purposes of this chapter, "division" means the Division of Industrial Accidents.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

